backups/20191114-os.lexc
LEXICON STR-INFL-PRES-OPT
%<1st%>%<sg%>:%>e 		# ;
%<2nd%>%<sg%>:%>es			# ;
%<3rd%>%<sg%>:%>e			# ;
%<1st%>%<pl%>:%>en		# ;
%<2nd%>%<pl%>:%>en		# ;
%<3rd%>%<pl%>:%>en		# ;

LEXICON STR-INFL-PRET-1Grade
%<indic%>%<1st%>%<sg%>:¹ #		;
%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<sg%>:¹ #		;

LEXICON STR-INFL-PRET-2Grade
%<indic%>:² STR-INFL-PRET-INDIC              ;
%<opt%>:² STR-INFL-PRET-OPT              ;

LEXICON STR-INFL-PRET-INDIC
%<2nd%>%<sg%>:%>i			# ;
%<1st%>%<pl%>:%>un		# ;
%<2nd%>%<pl%>:%>un		# ;
%<3rd%>%<pl%>:%>un		# ;

LEXICON STR-INFL-PRET-OPT
%<1st%>%<sg%>:%>i 		# ;
%<2nd%>%<sg%>:%>is			# ;
%<3rd%>%<sg%>:%>i			# ;
%<1st%>%<pl%>:%>in		# ;
%<2nd%>%<pl%>:%>in		# ;
%<3rd%>%<pl%>:%>in		# ;

LEXICON STR-IMPERATIV
%<sg%>:		#;
%<pl%>:%>ađ	#;

LEXICON WESAN
%<inf%>:wesan				#;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<sg%>:bium		#;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<sg%>:biun          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>:bist          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>:bis          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<sg%>:ist          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<sg%>:is          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<pl%>:sind          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<pl%>:sindun          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<pl%>:sindon          #;
!%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<pl%>:sundon
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>:sind          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>:sindun          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>:sindon          #;
!%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>:sundon          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<pl%>:sind          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<pl%>:sindun          #;
%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<pl%>:sindon          #;
!%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<pl%>:sundon          #;

%<pres%>%<opt%>%<1st%>%<sg%>:sî				#;
%<pres%>%<opt%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>:sîs                         #;
%<pres%>%<opt%>%<3rd%>%<sg%>:sî                         #;
%<pres%>%<opt%>%<3rd%>%<sg%>:wese                         #;
%<pres%>%<opt%>%<1st%>%<pl%>:sîn                         #;
%<pres%>%<opt%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>:sîn                        #;
%<pres%>%<opt%>%<3rd%>%<pl%>:sîn                         #;

%<pret%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<sg%>:was			#;
%<pret%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<sg%>:was                      #;
%<pret%>%<indic%>%<1st%>%<pl%>:wârun                      #;
%<pret%>%<indic%>%<3rd%>%<pl%>:wârun                      #;

%<pret%>%<opt%>%<1st%>%<sg%>:wâri                      #;
%<pret%>%<opt%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>:wâris                      #;
%<pret%>%<opt%>%<3rd%>%<sg%>:wâri                      #;
%<pret%>%<opt%>%<1st%>%<pl%>:wârin                      #;
%<pret%>%<opt%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>:wârin                      #;
%<pret%>%<opt%>%<3rd%>%<pl%>:wârin                      #;

%<imper%>%<sg%>:wis                         #;
%<imper%>%<sg%>:wes                         #;
%<imper%>%<pl%>:wesađ				#;
%<imper%>%<pl%>:wesat				#;

LEXICON Personal-Pronouns
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ic	#	;
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ec  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ik  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:mîn  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:mî  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:mî  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:mê  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:mik  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:wî  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:wê  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ûser  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ûs  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ûs  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<du%>%<nom%>:wit  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<du%>%<gen%>:uncero  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<du%>%<dat%>:unc  #       ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<1st%>%<du%>%<acc%>:unc  #       ;

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:thû		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:thîn	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:thî		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:thî		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:thî		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:gî		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ge		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:iuwar	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:iuwer	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:euwar	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:euwero	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:euwera	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:eu		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:iu		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:iu		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:iuu		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:iu		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:iu		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:iuu		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<du%>%<nom%>:git		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<du%>%<dat%>:inc		#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<2nd%>%<du%>%<acc%>:inc		#	;

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:hê	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:hi	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:hie	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:is	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:es	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:imu	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:imo	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:im	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:him	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ina	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:inan	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:sia	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:sie	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:sea	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:iro	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ira	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:era	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sia	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sie	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sea	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:im	#	;

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:it	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:et	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:is	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:es	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:imu	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:imo	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:im	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:him	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:it	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:et	#	;

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:siu	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sie	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sia	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sea	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ira	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:iru	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:iro	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ire	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:iru	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:iro	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:sie	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:sia	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:sea	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:sia	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:sea	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:siu	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ira	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:iru	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:iro	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ire	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:era	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:im	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sia	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sea	#	;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:siu	#	;

LEXICON Possessive-Pronouns
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<1st%>%<masc%>%<sg%>:mîn	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<2nd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>:thîn	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<sg%>:sîn	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<1st%>%<neut%>%<sg%>:mîn	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<2nd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>:thîn	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<sg%>:sîn	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<sg%>:ira		#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<3rd%>%<masc%>%<pl%>:iro	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<3rd%>%<neut%>%<pl%>:iro	#	;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<3rd%>%<fem%>%<pl%>:iro		#	;

LEXICON StrongVerbs
wesan%<v%>%<irregular%>: WESAN			;	!nhd. sein
